Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 918 (3) 91 th/ns/md H.F. 918 Section 1. Section 321.20, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. If the vehicle is a motor vehicle, the 3 owner shall certify on the application that financial liability 4 coverage is in effect for the motor vehicle pursuant to section 5 321.20B and provide a copy of the proof of financial liability 6 coverage card issued for the motor vehicle, a description of 7 the financial liability coverage as noted on the proof of 8 financial liability coverage card, or other documentation 9 acceptable to the department. This paragraph does not apply 10 to a motor vehicle excluded from the requirements of section 11 321.20B. 12 Sec. 2. Section 321.20B, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 13 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 14 Sec. 3. Section 321.20B, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 15 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 16 lieu thereof the following: 17 b. Issue a citation to the driver. 18 Sec. 4. Section 321.20B, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 19 following new subsections: 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. An owner or driver cited for or charged 21 with a violation of subsection 1 who produces to the clerk of 22 court prior to the date of the personâs court appearance proof 23 that financial liability coverage was in effect for the motor 24 vehicle at the time the person was stopped, or if the driver 25 is not the owner of the motor vehicle, proof that financial 26 liability coverage was in effect for the driver with respect 27 to the motor vehicle being driven at the time the driver was 28 stopped in the same manner as if the motor vehicle were owned 29 by the driver, shall be given a receipt indicating that proof 30 was provided, and the citation or charge shall be dismissed by 31 the court. Upon dismissal, the court or clerk of court shall 32 assess the costs of the action against the defendant. 33 NEW SUBSECTION . 5B. A person convicted of a violation of 34 subsection 1 is guilty of a simple misdemeanor punishable as 35 -1- HF 918 (3) 91 th/ns/md 1/ 3 H.F. 918 a scheduled violation under section 805.8A, subsection 14, 1 paragraph âfâ . 2 Sec. 5. Section 321.30, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The department or the county treasurer 5 shall refuse registration of a motor vehicle if the owner 6 does not provide satisfactory proof that financial liability 7 coverage is in effect for the motor vehicle pursuant to section 8 321.20B. This subsection does not apply to a motor vehicle 9 excluded from the requirements of section 321.20B. 10 Sec. 6. Section 321.40, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. A form for certification of financial 13 liability coverage pursuant to section 321.20B shall accompany 14 each renewal statement sent to the owner of a motor vehicle 15 under this section. The county treasurer shall refuse to renew 16 the registration of a motor vehicle if the applicant does not 17 submit satisfactory proof of financial liability coverage in 18 effect for the motor vehicle pursuant to section 321.20B. This 19 subsection does not apply to a motor vehicle excluded from the 20 requirements of section 321.20B. 21 Sec. 7. Section 805.8A, subsection 14, paragraph f, Code 22 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 f. Proof of financial responsibility. If, in connection with 24 a motor vehicle accident, a person is charged and found guilty 25 of a violation of section 321.20B, subsection 1 , the scheduled 26 fine is six hundred forty-five dollars; otherwise, the 27 scheduled fine for a violation of section 321.20B, subsection 28 1 , is three hundred twenty-five dollars. 29 (1) The scheduled fine for a violation of section 321.20B, 30 subsection 1, is as follows: 31 (a) If the violation occurred in connection 32 with a motor vehicle accident . . . . . . . . . . . . $645. 33 (b) If the violation did not occur in connection 34 with a motor vehicle accident . . . . . . . . . . . . $325. 35 -2- HF 918 (3) 91 th/ns/md 2/ 3 H.F. 918 (c) For a second violation within five years, the scheduled 1 fine under subparagraph division (a) or (b), as applicable, 2 shall be doubled. 3 (d) For a third or subsequent violation within five years, 4 the scheduled fine under subparagraph division (a) or (b), as 5 applicable, shall be tripled. 6 (2) Notwithstanding section 805.12 , fines collected 7 pursuant to this paragraph shall be submitted to the state 8 court administrator and distributed fifty percent to the victim 9 compensation fund established in section 915.94 , twenty-five 10 percent to the county in which such fine is imposed, and 11 twenty-five percent to the general fund of the state. 12 Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take effect December 13 1, 2028: 14 1. The section of this Act enacting section 321.20, 15 subsection 1, paragraph âgâ. 16 2. The section of this Act enacting section 321.30, 17 subsection 4. 18 3. The section of this Act enacting section 321.40, 19 subsection 11. 20 -3- HF 918 (3) 91 th/ns/md 3/ 3